Alabama, session 2026rs, HB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 22-9A-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§22-9A-6
(a)(1) The board shall by rule determine, by rule, the
items or information to be contained on certificates of birth,
death, marriage, and divorce and on reports of fetal death and
induced termination of pregnancy. Each certificate, report,
and other document required by this chapter shall be in a
format prescribed by the State Registrar.
(2) Certificates of death may not include a date of
disposition.
(b) Information required in certificates or reports
authorized by this chapter may be filed and registered by
photographic, electronic, or other means as prescribed by the
State Registrar."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB289 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 05-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 17-Mar-26 Passed



Page 2